New Jersey, session 222, A5077.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.   A public utility providing electric, gas, sewer, telephone, or water service shall provide written notice in a customers utility bill, of upcoming, scheduled utility service work, which is not the result of an emergency, that could impact traffic within a three-mile radius of the customers residence, as determined by the board. b.    As used in this section: Board means the Board of Public Utilities or any successor agency. Emergency means any condition constituting a clear and present danger to life, health, or property caused by a sudden natural or man-made disaster or related event. Public utility shall have the same meaning as provided in R.S.48:2-13. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.